Illinois, session 104th, SB1562.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois-Ireland Trade Commission Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) As a result of the Brexit agreement following the 8    United Kingdom's exit from the European Union, Northern 9    Ireland uniquely now has access to both the United 10    Kingdom's market of 67,000,000 people and the European 11    Union market of 450,000,000 people.12        (2) There are 950 United States companies based in 13    Ireland, using it as a gateway to the European Union.14        (3) Ireland is the 9th largest investor in the United 15    States.16        (4) International trade is critical for the economic 17    growth and prosperity of the State of Illinois, supports 18    well-paid jobs in Illinois, raises Illinois living 19    standards, and helps Illinoisans provide for their 20    families with affordable goods and services. 21    Section 10. Illinois-Ireland Trade Commission. The 22Illinois-Ireland Trade Commission is created to build on the   SB1562- 2 -LRB104 10124 SPS 20196 b12-way relationship between Illinois and Ireland to promote 2economic growth, trade, and education. The Commission shall be 3composed of the following members: 4    (1) one member of the Senate appointed by the President of 5the Senate;6    (2) one member of the Senate appointed by the Minority 7Leader of the Senate;8    (3) one member of the House of Representatives appointed 9by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;10    (4) one member of the House of Representatives appointed 11by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives;12    (5) the Deputy Governor for Budget and Economy or his or 13her designee; 14    (6) the Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity or 15his or her designee;16    (7) the Consul General of Ireland in Chicago or his or her 17designee;18    (8) the Executive Director of the Illinois Chamber of 19Commerce or his or her designee;20    (9) the President of the Chicagoland Chamber of Commerce 21or his or her designee;22    (10) the President of the Illinois Retail Merchants 23Association or his or her designee;24    (11) the President of the Illinois Manufacturers' 25Association or his or her designee; and26    (12) the President of the Illinois Hotel & Lodging   SB1562- 3 -LRB104 10124 SPS 20196 b1Association or his or her designee.  2    Section 15. Chair and Vice-Chair. The President of the 3Senate shall designate a Chair and Vice-Chair from among 4Commission members. 5    Section 20. Administrative support. The Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall provide administrative 7support for the Commission.  8    Section 25. Reimbursement for expenses. The members of the 9Commission shall serve without compensation but may be 10reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their 11duties on the Commission. 12    Section 30. Meetings. The Commission shall meet at least 13twice per calendar year, beginning in 2025. 14    Section 35. Funds; gifts. The Commission may raise funds, 15through direct solicitation or other fundraising events, 16alone, or with other groups, and accept gifts, grants, and 17bequests from individuals, corporations, foundations, 18governmental agencies, and public and private organizations 19and institutions. Funds shall only be used to carry out the 20duties of the Commission.   SB1562- 4 -LRB104 10124 SPS 20196 b1    Section 40. Annual report. The Commission shall file a 2report by the end of each calendar year detailing any actions 3made by the Commission, as well as new or expanded relations 4between Illinois and Irish entities, with the Governor, the 5General Assembly, and the Director of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.